Illinois, session 104th, SB325.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Early Intervention Services System Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (325 ILCS 20/1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 4151)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2026)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Early 9Intervention Services System Act.10(Source: P.A. 87-680.)